Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1814.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Substance use disorder treatment standards and oversight study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The substance use disorder treatment standards and oversight study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the senate who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the president of the senate. The president of the senate shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the study committee.  One member shall be the chairperson of the senate health and human services committee, or its successor committee. 2. Two members of the house of representatives who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the study committee.  One member shall be the chairperson of the house of representatives health and human services committee, or its successor committee. 3. The governor or the governor's designee. 4. The director of the Arizona health care cost containment system or the director's designee. 5. The director of the department of health services or the director's designee. 6. The attorney general or the attorney general's designee. 7. Two members who are licensed clinical behavioral health specialists, one of whom practices in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons, and who are appointed by the president of the senate. 8. Two physicians who are board-certified in either addiction medicine or addiction psychiatry, one of whom practices in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons, and who provide medical care to individuals with substance use disorder and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 9. One member who represents leadership from a medical society or a physician organization that specializes in treating substance use disorder and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 10. One member with substance use disorder who has direct experience with navigating treatment for substance use disorder in this state, who lives in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 11. One member who represents a membership-based advocacy organization that represents health care providers who specialize in substance use disorder treatment and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 12. One member who represents a behavioral health accrediting organization and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 13. One peer recovery support specialist who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 14. One member who represents a county law enforcement agency and who is appointed by the president of the senate. B. The study committee shall meet at the call of the cochairpersons. C. Members of the study committee are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The study committee shall: 1. Conduct a comprehensive survey and research study to assess the availability, capacity and geographic distribution of licensed and unlicensed programs that offer substance use disorder specialty care in this state and evaluate the economic impact, effectiveness and value of implementing statewide minimum standards for evidence-based care. 2. Identify gaps in access to and implementation of evidence-based biopsychosocial treatments, workforce capacity needs and resources necessary to support high-quality care delivery across urban and rural settings, including medically supported withdrawal services, medications for opioid use disorder, licensed clinical providers, care coordination and recovery supports. 3. Review state laws, rules and oversight structures governing substance use disorder treatment programs, identify regulatory loopholes that allow unlicensed or nonstandard programs to operate without sufficient clinical oversight and processes that enable fraud, waste and abuse, and recommend statutory and administrative changes to close these gaps and align oversight systems. 4. Establish minimum clinical quality standards, staff scope of practice expectations, safety and outcome reporting requirements and public transparency mechanisms to ensure accountability, protect patients and provide families and referring providers with clear information to support treatment decision-making. 5. Investigate funding needs, reimbursement structures and licensed workforce models required to implement these reforms, including strategies to build and sustain a professional clinical workforce capable of meeting statewide treatment demand and ensuring timely access to evidence-based care. E. On or before December 31, 2027, the substance use disorder treatment standards and oversight study committee shall submit a report regarding the committee's activities, findings and recommendations, including proposed statutory and regulatory changes, funding considerations and implementation timelines, to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. F. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2028. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.